languages/apertium-mkd/apertium-mkd.mkd.dix
<pardef n="потпиш/е__vblex"> <!-- perf perf"/><s n="iv --> <!-- свършен вид -->
  <e>        <p>          <l>и</l>          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ете</l>        <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>ам</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еш</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>е</l>          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еме</l>        <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ете</l>        <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ат</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>ев</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еше</l>        <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еше</l>        <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>евме</l>       <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>евте</l>       <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еа</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>ел</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ела</l>        <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ело</l>        <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>еле</l>        <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>ав</l>          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>а</l>           <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>а</l>           <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>авме</l>        <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>авте</l>        <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>аа</l>          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>ал</l>          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ала</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ало</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>але</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>ан</l>          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>аниот</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>аниов</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>анион</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ана</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>аната</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>анава</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>анана</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ано</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>аното</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>аново</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>аноно</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ани</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>аните</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>аниве</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>анине</l>         <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

	<e lm="потпише"><i>потпиш</i><par n="потпиш/е__vblex"/></e>
